California statutes. Education Code
(3) Determination of probable cause for an adverse action on the credential. If the allegation is for unprofessional or immoral conduct, the committee, in any formal review conducted pursuant to Section 44244 to determine probable cause, shall permit the employer of the credentialholder to be present while testimony is taken. If the allegation of unprofessional or immoral conduct involves sexual abuse, the employer shall be examined in the meeting for any relevant evidence relating to the sexual abuse.

(A) If the committee determines that probable cause for an adverse action does not exist, the committee shall terminate the investigation.

(B) If the committee determines that probable cause for an adverse action on the credential exists, upon receipt of a request from an applicant or a
 credentialholder pursuant to Section 44244.1, the commission shall initiate an adjudicatory hearing, as prescribed by Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, by filing an accusation or statement of issues.

(d) The committee has jurisdiction to commence a formal review pursuant to Section 44244 upon receipt of any of the following:

(1) (A) Official records of a state or federal court that reflect a conviction or plea, including a plea of nolo contendere, to a criminal offense or official records of a state court that adjudge a juvenile to be a dependent of the court pursuant to Section 300 of the Welfare and Institutions Code due to allegations of sexual misconduct or physical abuse by a credentialholder or applicant.

(B) Subparagraph
 (A) does not relieve the commission from the confidentiality provisions, notice, and due process requirements set forth in Section 827 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) An affidavit or declaration signed by a person with personal knowledge of the acts alleged to constitute misconduct.

(3) A statement described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b).

(4) Official records of a governmental licensing entity that reflect an administrative proceeding or investigation, otherwise authorized by law or regulation, that has become final.

(5) A notice described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (b).

(6) A response or failure to disclose, as described in paragraph (6) of subdivision (b).

(e) (1) Upon completion of its investigation, the committee shall report its actions and recommendations to the commission, including its findings as to probable cause, and if probable cause exists, its recommendations as to the appropriate adverse action.

(2) The findings shall be available, upon its request, to the employing or last known employing school district, or, if adverse action is recommended by the committee and the credentialholder has not filed a timely appeal of the recommendation of the committee pursuant to Section 44244.1, upon a request made within five years of the date of the committee’s recommendations to a school district providing verification that the credentialholder has applied for employment in the school district. The findings, for all purposes, shall remain confidential and limited to school district personnel in a direct
 supervisory capacity in relation to the person investigated. A person who otherwise releases findings received from the committee or the commission, absent a verified release signed by the person who is the subject of the investigation, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(3) The findings shall not contain any information that reveals the identity of persons other than the person who is the subject of the investigation.

(f) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) and, notwithstanding subdivision (b), for purposes of determining whether jurisdiction exists under subdivision (b), the commission, in accordance with Section 44341, may make inquiries and requests for production of information and records only from the Department of Justice, a law enforcement agency, a state or federal court, and a licensing agency of this state, or a licensing agency of another
 state.

(2) For purposes of determining whether jurisdiction exists, paragraph (1) does not apply to release of personnel records.

(g) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), convictions for controlled substance offenses listed in Section 11350 or 11377, or former Section 11500 or 11500.5, of the Health and Safety Code that are more than five years old, for which relief is granted pursuant to Section 1203.4, 1203.4a, 1203.41, 1203.42, 1203.425, or 1203.49 of the Penal Code, shall not be presented to the Committee on Credentials.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 460, Sec. 8.   (SB 848)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

44242.7.

(a) Any allegation of an act or omission by the holder of a credential, except for an allegation that involves sexual misconduct with a minor or recurring conduct resulting in a pattern of misconduct, shall be presented to the Committee of Credentials for initial review within four years from the date of the alleged act or omission, or within one year from the date the act or omission should reasonably have been discovered.

(b) The commission shall adopt regulations specifying conduct that is considered recurring conduct that results in a pattern of misconduct as set forth in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 342, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

44243.

(a) The commission may assign to the Committee of Credentials administrative duties as it may see fit relating to adverse actions concerning applicants and credential holders.

(b) The commission shall supervise the work of the committee and shall provide statements of policy relative to committee operation and procedures as it deems appropriate to do so.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 342, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

44244.

(a) At least 30 days prior to any formal review of the Committee of Credentials at which the application of an applicant or credential of a holder is to be considered, the committee shall notify the applicant or holder of the specific allegations of misconduct that make the application or credential subject to adverse action. The notification shall be in ordinary and concise language and set forth the acts or omissions charged and the statutes or rules violated. Supplemental allegations of misconduct shall be sent to the holder or applicant at least 30 days prior to the formal review. The portions of the investigation of the original or supplemental allegations that constitute the basis for the allegations shall be open to inspection and copying by the holder or applicant and his or her attorney. The statement of the allegations shall inform the applicant or holder that the allegations, if true, are sufficient to cause his or her application or credential to be subject to adverse action.

(b) (1) The formal review shall be held no later than six months after the commencement of the initial review as set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 44242.5. The formal review shall determine either that no adverse action shall be taken or that the allegations are sufficient to cause his or her application or credential to be subject to adverse action.

(2) All testimony before the committee shall be verified under penalty of perjury by oath or affirmation. The chairperson of the committee may administer the oath or affirmation. The chairperson may designate staff to administer the oath or affirmation for statements taken during the investigation of allegations of misconduct.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), the chairperson of the commission may grant the committee an extension of time, not exceeding six months, when the committee demonstrates that additional time is necessary to complete its investigation or determination, as described in subdivision (b).

(d) The recommendation of the committee shall be in writing and a copy of the recommendation shall be delivered to the credentialholder or applicant personally or sent to him or her by certified mail within 14 days after the formal review, together with specific information relative to any appeal rights to which the credentialholder or applicant is entitled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 79, Sec. 9.   Effective July 19, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

44244.1.

(a) (1) A recommendation by the Committee of Credentials to take an adverse action may be adopted by the commission without further proceedings if, after service of notice of the committee recommendation pursuant to Section 44244, the credential holder or applicant fails to give notice of intent to request an administrative hearing or if he or she gives notice of intent not to request an administrative hearing within 30 days.

(2) For good cause shown, the commission may grant an additional 30 days for filing of a request for an administrative hearing.

(b) The commission shall make no disclosures concerning private admonitions except as required by Section 44438.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 342, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

44245.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, all hearings and deliberations of the commission and Committee of Credentials to consider an adverse action or a reinstatement or reduction in penalty shall be closed sessions with only commission members, committee members, staff members, the credential holder or applicant whose application or credential is in issue, the counsel of the credential holder or applicant, and any material witnesses in attendance.

(b) All final actions taken pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be made public.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), disclosure of private admonitions shall be in accordance with Section 44438.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 342, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

44246.

When a hearing is held to deny, suspend, or revoke a credential, the proceeding shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the commission shall have all the powers granted therein.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44247.

Any applicant for the renewal certification document who is denied a renewal by the Committee of Credentials may request a reevaluation of his application by the commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44248.

(a) Any member of the commission, commission staff member, member or staff member of the Committee of Credentials, State Department of Education employee who releases or gives out information received at a commission or committee meeting or hearing or through the investigation of a certified employee without authorization of the commission or committee, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) Any material witness or his or her representative who releases or gives out information received at a commission or committee meeting or hearing, or who releases or gives out information obtained as a result of direct involvement in the investigation of a certified employee, without authorization of the commission or committee, is guilty of a misdemeanor unless this information was known to the material witness or his or her representative prior to that meeting, hearing, or investigation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 503, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Credential Types [44250. - 44277.]

44250.

The commission shall issue only the following two types of credentials, with authorizations as hereinafter defined:

(a) A teaching credential.

(b) A services credential.

The commission may issue an internship teaching or services credential.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 859, Sec. 2.   Effective October 6, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

44251.

(a) The period for which a credential, as authorized under Section 44250 issued prior to September 1, 1985, is valid shall be as follows:

(1) For an internship credential: two years.

(2) For a preliminary credential, pending completion of the clear credential program: five years.

(3) For a life credential: the life of the holder.

(b) The period for which a credential issued on or after September 1, 1985, as authorized under Section 44250 is valid, shall be as follows:

(1) For an internship credential: two years.

(2) For a preliminary credential, pending completion of a beginning teacher induction program approved by the commission or the clear credential program: five years.

(3) For a clear teaching credential: the life of the holder, if the holder submits an application and fee for renewal every five years and meets all professional fitness requirements under Sections 44339, 44340, and 44341.

(4) For a clear services credential: the life of the holder, if the holder submits an application and fee for renewal every five years and meets all professional fitness requirements under Sections 44339, 44340, and 44341.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 53, Sec. 3.   (SB 512)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

44251.2.

A credential, permit, certificate, or other document that is lawfully issued by the commission shall remain in force in accordance with the laws and regulations under which it was issued, and shall be exempt from new laws and regulations unless sections of this code are specifically amended to the contrary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 36, Sec. 1.   (AB 1374)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

44252.

(a) (1) The commission shall establish standards and procedures for the initial issuance and renewal of credentials.

(2) (A) The commission shall require an initial or renewal applicant who submits an initial or renewal application for the applicant’s credential online, as part of the application process, to read and attest by electronic signature a statement that the applicant for the credential understands the duties imposed on a holder of a teaching credential or a services credential pursuant to the Child Abuse and Neglect Reporting Act (Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 11164) of Chapter 2 of Title 1 of Part 4 of the Penal Code), including, but not limited to, the duty of a holder of a teaching credential or a
 services credential to report to any police department, sheriff’s department, county probation department authorized to receive reports, or county welfare department, whenever the credentialholder, in the credentialholder’s professional capacity or within the scope of the credentialholder’s employment, has knowledge of or observes a child whom the holder of a teaching credential or a services credential knows or reasonably suspects has been the victim of child abuse or neglect.

(B) The commission shall require an initial applicant who submits an application in paper form, as part of the application process, to read and attest by signature a statement that the applicant understands the duties imposed on a holder of a teaching credential or a services credential pursuant to the Child Abuse and Neglect Reporting Act (Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 11164) of Chapter 2 of Title 1 of Part 4 of the Penal Code), including, but not limited to, the
 duty of a holder of a teaching credential or a services credential to report to any police department, sheriff’s department, county probation department authorized to receive reports, or county welfare department, whenever the credentialholder, in the credentialholder’s professional capacity or within the scope of the credentialholder’s employment, has knowledge of or observes a child whom the holder of a teaching credential or a services credential knows or reasonably suspects has been the victim of child abuse or neglect.

(C) The statement described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) shall be substantially in the following form:
“As a documentholder authorized to work with children, it is part of my professional and ethical duty to report every instance of child abuse or neglect known or suspected to have occurred to a child with whom I have professional
 contact.

I understand that I must report immediately, or as soon as practicably possible, by telephone to a law enforcement agency or a child protective agency, and will send a written report and any evidence relating to the incident within 36 hours of becoming aware of the abuse or neglect of the child.

I understand that reporting the information regarding a case of possible child abuse or neglect to an employer, supervisor, school principal, school counselor, coworker, or other person is not a substitute for making a mandated report to a law enforcement agency or a child protective agency.

I understand that the reporting duties are individual and no supervisor or administrator may impede or inhibit my reporting duties.

I understand that once I submit a report, I am not required to disclose my identity to my employer.

I understand that my failure to report an instance of suspected child abuse or neglect as required by the Child Abuse and Neglect Reporting Act under Section 11166 of the Penal Code is a misdemeanor punishable by up to six months in jail or by a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

I acknowledge and certify that as a documentholder, I will fulfill all the duties required of a mandated reporter.”
(b) The commission shall not issue initially a credential, permit, certificate, or renewal of an emergency credential to a person to serve in the public schools unless the person has demonstrated proficiency in basic reading, writing, and mathematics skills in the English language as provided in Section 44252.5 or 44252.7. The commission shall exempt the following persons from the basic
 skills proficiency test requirement:

(1) A person credentialed solely for the purpose of teaching adults in an apprenticeship program.

(2) An applicant for an adult education designated subject credential for other than an academic subject.

(3) A person credentialed in another state who is an applicant for employment in a school district in this state who has passed a basic skills proficiency examination administered by the state where the person is credentialed.

(4) A person credentialed in another state who is an applicant for employment in a school district in this state who has passed a basic skills proficiency examination that has been developed and administered by the school district offering that person employment, by cooperating school
 districts, or by the appropriate county office of education. School districts administering a basic skills proficiency examination under this paragraph shall comply with the requirements of subdivision (h) of Section 44830. The applicant shall be granted a nonrenewable credential, valid for not longer than one year, pending fulfillment of the basic skills proficiency requirement pursuant to Section 44252.5.

(5) An applicant for a childcare center permit or a permit authorizing service in a development center for the handicapped if the holder of the permit is not required to have a baccalaureate degree.

(6) The holder of a credential, permit, or certificate to teach, other than an emergency permit, who seeks an additional authorization to teach.

(7) An applicant for a credential to provide service in the health
 profession.

(8) An applicant who achieves scores on the writing, reading, and mathematics sections of the College Board SAT Reasoning Test, the enhanced ACT Test, or the California State University Early Assessment Program that are sufficient to waive the English placement test and the entry level mathematics examination administered by the California State University.

(9) An applicant for an eminence credential to be issued pursuant to Section 44262.

(10) (A) An applicant who earns at least a letter grade of B in qualifying coursework determined by a credential preparation program, or determined by the commission for an applicant not enrolled in a California credential preparation program, to sufficiently serve as an indicator of proficiency in basic reading, writing, and mathematics skills in
 the English language. As used in this section, “qualifying coursework” means a course or courses taken at a regionally accredited institution of higher education for academic credit that applies toward the requirements for an associate’s degree, baccalaureate degree, or higher degree. Qualifying coursework does not include professional development or continuing education units, inservice training or workshops, or courses where credits do not apply toward the requirements for an associate’s degree, baccalaureate degree, or higher degree.

(B) (i) For purposes of subparagraph (A), the following courses are sufficient to serve as indicators of proficiency in basic reading, writing, and mathematics skills:

(I) For reading proficiency, a course in the subjects of critical thinking, literature, philosophy, reading, rhetoric, or textual analysis.

(II) For writing proficiency, a course in the subjects of composition, English, rhetoric, written communications, or writing.

(III) For mathematics proficiency, a course in the subjects of algebra, geometry, mathematics, quantitative reasoning, or statistics.

(ii) A course that does not fall within a subject described in clause (i) may serve as an alternative indicator of proficiency if the applicant provides documentation in writing from the registrar or relevant department chair of the regionally accredited institution of higher education where the course was taken that the course includes the study of subjects in reading, writing, or mathematics, as those terms are described in clause (i). A course that meets these standards may combine the study of reading and writing.

(C) Qualifying coursework shall be a semester-length course of at least three units or a quarter-length course of at least four units.

(11) A credential preparation program or the commission may determine that an applicant has demonstrated proficiency in basic reading, writing, and mathematics skills in the English language through a combination of qualifying coursework described in paragraph (10), passage of a component or components of the state basic skills proficiency test described in subdivision (d) of Section 44252.5, and scores described in paragraph (8).

(12) An applicant who has obtained a baccalaureate degree or higher degree from a regionally accredited institution of higher education.

(c) (1) The Superintendent shall adopt
 an appropriate state test to measure proficiency in these basic skills. In adopting the test, the Superintendent shall seek assistance from the commission and an advisory board. A majority of the members of the advisory board shall be classroom teachers. The advisory board also shall include representatives of school boards, school administrators, parents, and postsecondary educational institutions.

(2) The Superintendent shall adopt a normed test that the Superintendent determines will sufficiently test basic skills for purposes of this section.

(3) The Superintendent, in conjunction with the commission and approved teacher training institutions, shall take steps necessary to ensure the effective implementation of this section.

(d) This section does not require the holders of, or applicants for, a designated
 subjects special subjects credential to pass the state basic skills proficiency test unless the requirements for the specific credential required the possession of a baccalaureate degree. The governing board of a school district, the governing board of a consortium of school districts, or a governing board involved in a joint powers agreement that employs a holder of a designated subjects special subjects credential shall establish its own basic skills proficiency criteria for the holders of these credentials and shall arrange for those individuals to be assessed. The basic skills proficiency criteria established by the governing board shall be at least equivalent to the test required by the district, or in the case of a consortium or a joint powers agreement, by any of the participating districts, for graduation from high school. The governing board or boards may charge a fee to individuals being tested to cover the costs of the test, including the costs of developing, administering, and grading the
 test.

(e) The commission shall compile data regarding the rate of passing the state basic skills proficiency test by persons who have been trained in various institutions of higher education. The data shall be available to members of the public, including to persons who intend to enroll in teacher education programs.

(f) (1) Each applicant to an approved credential program, unless exempted by subdivision (b), shall take the state basic skills proficiency test in order to provide both the prospective applicant and the program with information regarding the proficiency level of the applicant. Test results shall be forwarded to each California postsecondary educational institution to which the applicant has applied. The program shall use test results to ensure that, upon admission, each applicant receives appropriate academic assistance necessary to pass the
 state basic skills proficiency test. Persons residing outside the state shall take the test no later than the second available administration following their enrollment in a credential program.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that applicants for admission to teacher preparation programs not be denied admission on the basis of state basic skills proficiency test results.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 28.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

44252.1.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that a credential candidate enrolled in a credential preparation program receive reasonable time to complete the program without meeting new requirements, including, but not limited to, requirements added by statutes, regulations, or commission standards, after the candidate’s enrollment in the program. Further, to ensure that all candidates for a credential receive reasonable information and advice as they proceed through their program, the Legislature finds and declares that it is incumbent upon credential preparation programs to inform candidates of new requirements and extension provisions available to eligible candidates.

(b) For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(1) “Enrolled” refers to an individual who, on or after January 1, 2002, continuously participates in and is working toward completing the requirements for a program that meets the minimum requirements for a California preliminary multiple or single subject teaching credential as specified in Section 44259. Whether an individual is enrolled shall be subject to verification by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing.

(2) “Continuously enrolled” refers to an individual who has begun a teacher preparation program and does not have a break in that participation that exceeds a period of 18 months.

(c) The commission shall adopt regulations to provide a credential candidate enrolled in a commission-accredited preparation program, including, but not limited to, an internship program as defined in Article 7.5 (commencing with Section 44325) and Article 3 (commencing with Section 44450), a professional preparation program as defined in Article 7 (commencing with Section 44320), or an integrated program of professional preparation as defined in Section 44259.1 with a grace period to complete the program without meeting new requirements, including, but not limited to, requirements added by statutes, regulations, or commission standards, after the candidate’s enrollment in the program. The commission shall also ensure through standards and accreditation procedures that credential preparation programs provide credential candidates with information about new requirements and extension provisions as outlined in this subdivision and subdivisions (d) and (e).

(1) The commission shall adopt regulations that provide a credential candidate enrolled in a commission-accredited preparation program time of not less than 24 months after enrollment in the program, during which time new or amended statutes, regulations, and commission standards that become effective and are imposed on credential candidates after the candidate’s enrollment date shall not apply to that candidate.

(2) The commission shall allow a credential candidate an extension of time in addition to the time specified pursuant to paragraph (1) to complete a credential program under the statutes, regulations, and commission standards in place at the time of the candidate’s enrollment if the candidate can demonstrate extenuating circumstances, including, but not limited to, personal or family illness, bereavement, or financial hardship and develops a plan, in consultation with the credential preparation program, for continued progress toward completion of the preparation program.

(d) The commission shall maintain a list of candidates who are allowed an extended time period to complete the program under the statutes, regulations, and commission standards in place at the time of the candidates’ enrollment prior to the effective date of a new or amended statute, regulation, or standard. This list shall include the projected date of program completion for each candidate.

(e) (1) A credential candidate enrolled in an integrated program of professional preparation pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 44259.1 is not subject to any new requirements added by statute, regulation, or commission standards if that candidate is continuously enrolled in the program, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), and does not change the type of credential or program he or she is pursuing once enrolled.

(2) A credential candidate continuously enrolled in an integrated program of professional preparation pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 44259.1 who has completed all requirements necessary to begin the student teaching component of his or her program shall be eligible to receive an extension of 12 months, if necessary, to complete the outstanding requirements that were in place when that credential candidate began the preparation program, and shall not be subject to any new requirements added by statute, regulation, or commission standards, once that candidate begins the student teaching portion of his or her program.

(3) This subdivision does not limit the ability of a candidate to seek additional time to complete a credential pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).

(4) By June 30, 2004, the commission shall report to the education policy committees in each house of the Legislature on the success of the integrated program of professional development pursuant to Section 44259.1 toward preparing teacher candidates, including, but not limited to, the number of students admitted to the teacher education component in each program, the number of students who have completed all course requirements, including student teaching, and who have applied for a credential, the number of students applying for and receiving an extension pursuant to subdivision (e), and the information collected pursuant to subdivision (d).

(f) This section does not supersede subdivision (h) of Section 44259.

(g) A modification of a credentialing examination by the commission that is made as the result of a validity study or a passing standard study shall not be considered a new requirement for purposes of this section.

(h) If credential preparation coursework that a credential candidate has not yet taken is modified, the candidate shall take the modified coursework instead of the previously required coursework unless the modified coursework is not readily available, the modified coursework would result in an increased cost to the candidate, or completion of the modified coursework would delay the candidate’s completion of the credential preparation program.

(i) Once a candidate has received a preliminary California teaching credential pursuant to Section 44259 and is employed as the teacher of record in a California public school, the candidate shall not be subject to any new requirements for completing the induction phase required to obtain the professional clear teaching credential pursuant to Section 44279.4, for a period not to exceed the length of time provided for the preliminary teaching credential pursuant to Section 44251.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 677, Sec. 26.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

44252.2.

Coursework completed at a community or junior college that is regionally accredited by an accrediting agency listed in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 44203 or by the Accrediting Commission for Community and Junior Colleges of the Western Association of Schools and Colleges may count as qualifying coursework for purposes of paragraph (10) of subdivision (b) of Section 44252.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 663, Sec. 5.   (AB 320)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

44252.5.

(a) The commission shall administer the state basic skills proficiency test pursuant to Sections 44227, 44252, and 44830 in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the commission. A fee shall be charged to individuals being tested to cover the costs of the test, including the costs of developing, administering, and grading the test. The amount of the fee shall be established by the commission to recover the cost of examination administration and development pursuant to Section 44235.3.

(b) The commission may enter into agreements with other states permitting the use of the state basic skills proficiency test as a requirement for the issuance of credentials or for teacher preparation program admission in those other
 states, provided that the use would advance the interests of the State of California and that the other states reimburse the Teacher Credentials Fund for a proportionate share of costs of the development and administration of the test.

(c) An individual who possesses a baccalaureate degree or higher degree from a regionally accredited institution of higher education, or passes the state basic skills proficiency test, as adopted by the Superintendent, shall be considered proficient in the skills of reading, writing, and mathematics, and shall not be required to be retested by this test for purposes of meeting the proficiency requirements of Sections 44227, 44252, and 44830.

(d) An individual who passes one or more components of the state basic skills proficiency test in the subjects of basic reading, writing, or mathematics shall be deemed to have demonstrated the individual’s
 proficiency in these subject areas and shall not be required to be retested in these subjects during subsequent test administrations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 29.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

44252.6.

(a) The commission, no later than July 1, 2007, shall ensure that the California Subject Examinations for Teachers (CSET): Multiple Subjects be modified to add an assessment of basic writing skills at least as comprehensively and to the level of rigor that basic writing skills are assessed by the state basic skills proficiency test.

(b) Any individual who passes the CSET: Multiple Subjects, after it has been adjusted pursuant to subdivision (a), with the necessary score determined by the commission, shall be considered proficient in the skills of reading, writing, and mathematics, and shall not be required to pass the state basic skills
 proficiency requirements of Sections 44227, 44252, and 44830.

(c) The commission shall ensure that the consolidation and modification of assessments pursuant to this section does not result in an increase in the total fees paid by teacher credential candidates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 678, Sec. 2.   (SB 488)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

44252.8.

(a) The commission may defer the state basic skills proficiency test requirement in any case when illness, a family death, or another similar and justifiable personal reason prevented a credential applicant who had registered to take the test from taking the test, or in any case when circumstances entirely beyond the control of the applicant prevented his or her receipt of proof of having passed the test. However, the commission shall not grant a deferral to any person who has failed the state basic skills proficiency test.

Any person granted a deferral pursuant to this section shall take the state basic skills proficiency test at the next available opportunity, or the deferral shall terminate. If any person granted a deferral fails to pass the test, the deferral shall terminate.

(b) The commission shall keep a record of deferrals granted, the persons to whom they were granted, and the reasons for the deferrals.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 989, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

44252.9.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the effective education of pupils in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, depends substantially on the academic skills, content competence, and pedagogical preparation of classroom teachers. It is essential that the ongoing administration of the state basic skills proficiency exam for teachers be carried out at all times by a competent contractor who adheres to high standards using sound, effective, and defensible assessment procedures. The administration of this exam is jeopardized by the increasing costs of the exam and statutory restrictions that remain in effect. To preserve and strengthen the screening of teacher candidates in relation to their basic academic skills, the Legislature intends to maintain the state examination that is administered by the commission pursuant to Section 44252.5, and to support needed improvements in exam-related services to teaching credential candidates.

(b) The commission shall make improvements to increase access to the state basic skills proficiency test, and shall improve exam-related services provided to candidates for teaching credentials, which may include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) Administering the test more frequently.

(2) Increasing the number of testing locations.

(3) Making the exam available year-round by appointment at examination centers that are highly secure and professionally supervised.

(c) The commission shall adopt these improvements in consultation with the Department of Finance and shall report all improvements to the Legislature, no later than January 1, 2003.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 745, Sec. 17.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

44253.1.
